Louisiana, session 2026, HB35.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2175.1(A)(3)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:2175.1(A)(3)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2175.1. Funding deposit account
A.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 11:103 and 104, the board of
trustees may require a net direct contribution rate of up to three percent more than
the rate as provided in R.S. 11:103.
(c) All surplus funds collected for any fiscal year terminating on or after
December 31, 2008, in which the board of trustees sets the direct employer
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 35 ENROLLED
contribution rate higher than the minimum recommended rate pursuant to the
provisions of Subparagraph (a) or (b) of this Paragraph, shall be credited to the
account.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.